Maryland, session 2026, SB0181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources

SENATE BILL 181 3
10–408.
(a) (1) In this section[, “handgun”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “HANDGUN” means a firearm:
[(1)] (I) With a barrel length not exceeding 6 inches; and
[(2)] (II) That does not have a scope or an electronic device attached.
(3) “NONLEAD AMMUNITION” INCLUDES:
(I) AMMUNITION IN WHICH THERE IS LESS THAN 1% LEAD
CONTENT; AND
(II) ANY FEDERALLY APPROVED NONTOXIC AMMUNITION.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Department
shall:
(i) Prescribe by regulation the means or weapons for hunting
designated wildlife; and
(ii) Set forth any restrictions relating to weapons used to hunt
designated wildlife, including the amount [and], size, AND TYPE of ammunition for
designated game birds or mammals.
(2) The Department may not prohibit a licensed bow hunter from openly
carrying a handgun that the hunter is otherwise authorized to carry under § 4–203 of the
Criminal Law Article if the bow hunter:
(i) Is at least 21 years old;
(ii) Is hunting in deer management Region A as defined by the
Department’s Guide to Hunting and Trapping;
(iii) Is carrying the handgun for personal protection; and
(iv) Does not use the handgun to kill wildlife wounded by a vertical
bow or crossbow.
(c) The Department shall make the regulations available for distribution with
each hunting license purchased.

SENATE BILL 181
(d) This section does not authorize the Department to restrict the use of firearms
except in the activity of hunting designated wildlife.
(E) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2029 2030, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE THE USE OF
NONLEAD AMMUNITION FOR THE HUNTING OF ALL GAME SPECIES.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AUTHORIZE THE USE OF LEAD
AMMUNITION FOR MUZZLELOADERS, HANDGUNS, RIFLES, AND SHOTGUNS IF
NONLEAD AMMUNITION IS NOT COMMERCIALLY AVAILABLE FOR THE SPECIFIC
UNLESS THE DEER WAS HARVESTED USING NONLEAD AMMUNITION OR A BOW AND
ARROW, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROHIBIT A PERSON FROM DONATING
PROCESSED DEER MEAT TO A VENISON DONATION PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY AN
ORGANIZATION THAT IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE WEAPON FIREARM.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AUTHORIZE THE USE OF LEAD
AMMUNITION BY AN INDIVIDUAL HUNTING DEER UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF A DEER
MANAGEMENT PERMIT ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2031.
(3) (2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES REGULATIONS OF THE
DEPARTMENT REQUIRING THE USE OF NONLEAD AMMUNITION FOR HUNTING THE
PROHIBITION IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR A FIRST OFFENSE IS
SUBJECT TO A CIVIL FINE NOT EXCEEDING $750.
(4) (3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY
OUT THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2030, the Department of Natural Resources shall report to the Senate Committee on
Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House Environment and Transportation
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on inspections
performed by the Natural Resources Police Force detailing violations in venison processing
facilities under § 10–408(e) of the Natural Resources Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this
Act.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–408.

SENATE BILL 181 5
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, on or before July
1, 2030, the Department shall require the use of nonlead ammunition for the hunting of all
game species.
(2) (i) The Department shall authorize the use of lead ammunition for
muzzleloaders, handguns, rifles, and shotguns if nonlead ammunition is not commercially
available for the specific firearm.
(ii) The Department shall authorize the use of lead ammunition by
an individual hunting deer under the authority of a deer management permit on or before
June 30, 2031.
(3) [A person who violates regulations of the Department requiring the use
of nonlead ammunition for hunting for a first offense is subject to a civil fine not exceeding
$750.
(4)] The Department shall adopt regulations to carry out this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before July 1, 2027, the Department of Natural Resources shall adopt
regulations requiring the use of nonlead ammunition for hunting pen–raised birds on
regulated shooting areas.
(b) On or before July 1, 2028, the Department of Natural Resources shall adopt
regulations requiring the use of nonlead ammunition for hunting:
(1) upland game birds;
(2) webless migratory game birds; and
(3) wild turkey.
(c) On or before July 1, 2029, the Department of Natural Resources shall adopt
regulations requiring nonlead ammunition for:
(1) muzzleloaders, handguns, rifles, and shotguns used for hunting deer;
and
(2) hunting any other game species not specified in this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2031.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026 2027.